Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-191.06
Department; adopt rules and regulations.

The department may adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind such rules and regulations as necessary or appropriate to implement the purposes of sections 45-189 to 45-191.11.

Laws 1993, LB 270, § 8.